District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.06

Resignation of director.

A director may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the limited cooperative association. Unless the notice states a later effective date, a resignation shall be effective when the notice is received by the association.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 806 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition